North Carolina, session 2025, HB943.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
*H943-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring funds for
each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be provided to the nonprofit organization known
as the North Carolina Foundation for Public School Children to be used for the North Carolina
Teacher Cadet Program. The funds shall be used for the following services related to expansion
of the educator pipeline:
(1) Statewide curriculum training workshops for teachers with options for
in-person and online ongoing support.
(2) Expansion of services in counties designated as development tier one areas.
For schools located in counties identified in this subdivision, the North
Carolina Teacher Cadet Program shall prioritize schools with the highest
teacher attrition rate from the 2022-2023 school year.
(3) Continued development and training for persons in underrepresented teaching
demographics, including cadets who are male and cadets who are persons of
color. To the extent possible, the training shall draw on past and current cadets
who are classroom teachers, postsecondary students pursuing a degree in
education, and seniors in high school.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 943-First Edition